Wisconsin, session 2025, SB682.
do enact as follows:SB682,11Section 1. 94.55 (1) of the statutes is amended to read:SB682,2,11294.55 (1) Definition. In this section, “hemp” means the plant Cannabis 3sativa L. and any part of that plant, including the seeds thereof and all derivatives, 4extracts, cannabinoids, isomers, acids, salts, and salts of isomers, whether growing 5or not, with a delta-9-tetrahydrocannabinol concentration of not more than 0.3 6percent on a dry weight basis or the maximum concentration allowed under federal 7law up to 1 percent, whichever is greater, as tested using post-decarboxylation high-8performance liquid chromatography, gas chromatography-mass spectrometry, or 9other similarly reliable methods. “Hemp” includes a hemp-derived cannabinoid 10product, as defined in sub. (5) (a) 4. “Hemp” does not include a prescription drug 11product that has been approved by the U.S. food and drug administration.SB682,212Section 2. 94.55 (5) of the statutes is created to read:SB682,2,131394.55 (5) Hemp-derived cannabinoid products. (a) In this subsection:SB682,2,15141. “Batch” means a specific quantity of a hemp-derived cannabinoid product 15that is all of the following:SB682,2,1716a. Manufactured at the same time and using the same methods, equipment, 17and ingredients.SB682,2,1918b. Uniform and intended to meet specifications for identity, strength, purity, 19and composition.SB682,3,21c. Manufactured, packaged, and labeled according to a single batch production 2record.SB682,3,532. “Hemp concentrate” means the extracts or resins of hemp, including 4extracts or resins that are refined to increase the presence of targeted 5cannabinoids, but does not include refined cannabinoids or synthetic cannabinoids.SB682,3,863. “Hemp-derived cannabinoid” means any cannabinoid, except 7tetrahydrocannabinol acetate or any synthetic cannabinoid, that is extracted from 8hemp, including a refined cannabinoid and including any of the following:SB682,3,109a. Delta-6-tetrahydrocannabinol or delta-6-tetrahydrocannabinolic acid or 10delta-6-tetrahydrocannabivarin.SB682,3,1211b. Delta-8-tetrahydrocannabinol or delta-8-tetrahydrocannabinolic acid or 12delta-8-tetrahydrocannabivarin.SB682,3,1413c. Delta-9-tetrahydrocannabinol or delta-9-tetrahydrocannabinolic acid or 14delta-9-tetrahydrocannabivarin.SB682,3,1615d. Delta-10-tetrahydrocannabinol or delta-10-tetrahydrocannabinolic acid or 16delta-10-tetrahydrocannabivarin.SB682,3,21174. “Hemp-derived cannabinoid product” means a product that contains or that 18is labeled to contain a hemp-derived cannabinoid and that is produced, marketed, or 19otherwise intended to be ingested orally, inhaled, or absorbed through the skin, 20except that “hemp-derived cannabinoid product” does not include any of the 21following:SB682,3,2422a. A product containing hemp concentrate intended for external application to 23a part of the body of a human or animal and not intended to be absorbed through 24the skin and into the bloodstream.SB682,4,41b. A cannabidiol product, as defined in s. 961.01 (3r), that is governed by ss. 2961.32 (2m) and 961.38 (1n) (b), and any tetrahydrocannabinol contained in a 3cannabidiol product that is dispensed as provided in s. 961.38 (1n) (a) or that is 4possessed as provided in s. 961.32 (2m) (b).SB682,4,65c. A prescription drug product that has been approved by the U.S. food and 6drug administration.SB682,4,975. “Label” includes material attached to, printed or embossed on, or 8incorporated into the immediate container in which an hemp-derived cannabinoid 9product is sold or offered for sale.SB682,4,16106. “Refined cannabinoid” means a cannabinoid extracted from hemp with a 11chemical makeup that is changed after extraction to create a different cannabinoid 12or other chemical compound by applying a catalyst other than heat or light. 13“Refined cannabinoid” includes any tetrahydrocannabinol created from cannabidiol 14or hemp concentrate, except that “refined cannabinoid” does not include 15tetrahydrocannabinol acetate or any synthetic cannabinoid and does not include a 16product described in subd. 4. a. to c.SB682,4,20177. “Synthetic cannabinoid” means a substance with a similar chemical 18structure and pharmacological activity to a cannabinoid but that is not extracted or 19derived from hemp and is instead created or produced by chemical or biochemical 20synthesis.SB682,4,21218. “Underage person” means a person who has not attained 21 years of age.SB682,4,2322(b) 1. No person may sell, offer to sell, or otherwise provide a hemp-derived 23cannabinoid product to an underage person.SB682,5,2242. An underage person may not purchase, attempt to purchase, or possess a 1hemp-derived cannabinoid product or falsely represent his or her age for the 2purpose of obtaining a hemp-derived cannabinoid product.SB682,5,533. Proof of all of the following by a seller of hemp-derived cannabinoid 4products to an underage person is a defense to any prosecution for a violation of 5subd. 1.:SB682,5,76a. That the purchaser falsely represented that he or she had attained 21 years 7of age.SB682,5,98b. That the appearance of the purchaser was such that an ordinary and 9prudent person would believe that the purchaser had attained 21 years of age.SB682,5,1210c. That the sale was made in good faith and in reliance on the representation 11and appearance of the purchaser in the belief that the purchaser had attained 21 12years of age.SB682,5,1413d. That the underage person supported the representation under subd. 3. a. 14with documentation that he or she had attained 21 years of age.SB682,5,1915(c) 1. No person may sell, or offer to sell, to a consumer a hemp-derived 16cannabinoid product unless the product manufacturer has first submitted a 17representative sample of each batch of the product to an independent, accredited 18laboratory for testing in accordance with generally accepted industry standards and 19the laboratory certifies all of the following:SB682,5,2420a. The product contains the amount of cannabinoids stated on the label of the 21product, disclosed as a percentage, as milligrams per serving, and, if there is more 22than one serving of the product in a package or container, as total milligrams for 23the package or container, within a tolerance of one milligram or 10 percent, 24whichever is greater.SB682,6,31b. The product does not contain more than trace amounts of any mold, 2residual solvents, or other catalysts, pesticides, fertilizers, mycotoxins, or heavy 3metals.SB682,6,64c. The product does not contain a delta-9-tetrahydrocannabinol concentration 5of more than 0.3 percent on a dry weight basis or the maximum concentration 6allowed under federal law up to 1 percent, whichever is greater.SB682,6,972. A laboratory that certifies a hemp-derived cannabinoid product as provided 8in subd. 1. shall provide the manufacturer with a certificate of analysis of testing 9results for the product.SB682,6,13103. No person may sell, or offer to sell, to a consumer a hemp-derived 11cannabinoid product unless the product is accompanied by the certificate of 12analysis of testing results specified in subd. 2., which may be provided by means of 13a quick response code on the product’s label.SB682,6,1614(d) 1. A hemp-derived cannabinoid product may not be sold or offered for sale 15to a consumer unless the product bears one or more labels containing all of the 16following information:SB682,6,1817a. The name, location, phone number, and website address of the product’s 18manufacturer or brand owner.SB682,6,1919b. The product’s batch number. Down Down /2025/related/proposals/sb682 true proposaltext /2025/related/proposals/sb682 proposaltext/2025/REG/SB682 proposaltext/2025/REG/SB682 section true Menu»2025»Related Documents»Proposal Text»SB682: Bill Text × Details for PDF view Link (Permanent link) Bookmark this location View toggle Go to top of document Search in this chapter Search in this section Search in this agency Search in this chapter group Search in this chapter Search in this section Cross references for section Acts affecting this section References to this 1970 Statutes Annotations Appellate Court Citations Administrative Code Index Reference lines Clear highlighting